Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.331

Annual report on workers' compensation fraud.

The department shall annually compile a comprehensive report on workers' compensation fraud in Washington. The report shall include the department's activities related to the prevention, detection, and prosecution of worker, employer, and provider fraud and the cost of such activities, as well as the actual and estimated cost savings of such activities. The report shall be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature prior to the start of the legislative session in January.

[ 1995 c 160 s 7.]